Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.110

Advertising authority to solemnize marriages is breach of judicial ethics.

It shall be a breach of judicial ethics for any judge of any court of limited jurisdiction, as defined in RCW 3.02.010, to advertise in any manner that he or she is authorized to solemnize marriages. Any violation of this section shall be grounds for forfeiture of office.

[ 1983 c 186 s 3; 1961 c 299 s 122.]